Missouri, session 2026, SB1042.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 571.075, to read as
follows:
571.075. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Handgun", a firearm that has a short stock and is
designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand;
(2) "Juvenile detention facility", the same meaning as
defined under section 211.151;
(3) "Minor", a person who is under eighteen years of
age or, if a member of the United States Armed Forces, under
eighteen years of age.
2. A person commits the offense of unlawful possession
of a handgun if the person is a minor and knowingly
possesses a handgun.
3. The offense of unlawful possession of a handgun is
punishable by imposition of a fine not to exceed two hundred
dollars, imprisonment in a juvenile detention facility for a
period not to exceed ten days, or both.
✓